Utah statutes.
7-23-401.   Operational requirements for deferred deposit loans.
(1)  If a deferred deposit lender extends a deferred deposit loan, the
deferred deposit lender shall:
(a)  post in a conspicuous location on its premises that can be viewed by a
person seeking a deferred deposit loan:
(i)  a complete schedule of any interest or fees charged for a deferred
deposit loan that states the interest and fees using dollar amounts;
(ii)  a number the person can call to make a complaint to the department
regarding the deferred deposit loan; and
(iii)  a list of states where the deferred deposit lender is registered or
authorized to offer deferred deposit loans through the Internet or other
electronic means;
(b)  enter into a written contract for the deferred deposit loan;
(c)  conspicuously disclose in the written contract:
(i)  that under Subsection (3)(a), a person receiving a deferred deposit loan
may make a partial payment in increments of at least $5 on the principal owed
on the deferred deposit loan without incurring additional charges above the
charges provided in the written contract;
(ii)  that under Subsection (3)(b), a person receiving a deferred deposit loan
may rescind the deferred deposit loan on or before 5 p.m. of the next business
day without incurring any charges;
(iii)  that under Subsection (4)(b), the deferred deposit loan may not be
rolled over without the person receiving the deferred deposit loan requesting
the rollover of the deferred deposit loan;
(iv)  that under Subsection (4)(c), the deferred deposit loan may not be
rolled over if the rollover requires the person to pay the amount owed by the
person under the deferred deposit loan in whole or in part more than 10 weeks
after the day on which the deferred deposit loan is executed; and
(v) (A)  the name and address of a designated agent required to be provided
the department under Subsection 7-23-201(2)(d)(vi); and
(B)  a statement that service of process may be made to the designated agent;
(d)  provide the person seeking the deferred deposit loan:
(i)  a copy of the written contract described in Subsection (1)(c); and
(ii)  written notice that if the person seeking the deferred deposit loan is
eligible to enter into an extended payment plan, the deferred deposit lender
provides an extended payment plan described in Section 7-23-403;
(e)  orally review with the person seeking the deferred deposit loan the terms
of the deferred deposit loan including:
(i)  the amount of any interest rate or fee;
(ii)  the date on which the full amount of the deferred deposit loan is due;
(iii)  that under Subsection (3)(a), a person receiving a deferred deposit
loan may make a partial payment in increments of at least $5 on the principal
owed on the deferred deposit loan without incurring additional charges above
the charges provided in the written contract;
(iv)  that under Subsection (3)(b), a person receiving a deferred deposit loan
may rescind the deferred deposit loan on or before 5 p.m. of the next business
day without incurring any charges;
(v)  that under Subsection (4)(b), the deferred deposit loan may not be rolled
over without the person receiving the deferred deposit loan requesting the
rollover of the deferred deposit loan; and
(vi)  that under Subsection (4)(c), the deferred deposit loan may not be
rolled over if the rollover requires the person to pay the amount owed by the
person under the deferred deposit loan in whole or in part more than 10 weeks
after the day on which the deferred deposit loan is executed; and
(f)  comply with the following as in effect on the date the deferred deposit
loan is extended:
(i)  Truth in Lending Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq., and its implementing
federal regulations;
(ii)  Equal Credit Opportunity Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1691, and its implementing
federal regulations;
(iii)  Bank Secrecy Act, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1829b, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1951 through
1959, and 31 U.S.C. Sec. 5311 through 5332, and its implementing regulations;
and
(iv)  Title 70C, Utah Consumer Credit Code.
(2)  If a deferred deposit lender extends a deferred deposit loan through the
Internet or other electronic means, the deferred deposit lender shall provide
the information described in Subsection (1)(a) to the person receiving the
deferred deposit loan:
(a)  in a conspicuous manner; and
(b)  prior to the person entering into the deferred deposit loan.
(3)  A deferred deposit lender that engages in a deferred deposit loan shall
permit a person receiving a deferred deposit loan to:
(a)  make partial payments in increments of at least $5 on the principal owed
on the deferred deposit loan at any time prior to maturity without incurring
additional charges above the charges provided in the written contract; and
(b)  rescind the deferred deposit loan without incurring any charges by
returning the deferred deposit loan amount to the deferred deposit lender on
or before 5 p.m. the next business day following the deferred deposit loan
transaction.
(4)  A deferred deposit lender that engages in a deferred deposit loan may
not:
(a)  collect additional interest on a deferred deposit loan with an
outstanding principal balance 10 weeks after the day on which the deferred
deposit loan is executed;
(b)  roll over a deferred deposit loan without the person receiving the
deferred deposit loan requesting the rollover of the deferred deposit loan;
(c)  roll over a deferred deposit loan if the rollover requires a person to
pay the amount owed by the person under a deferred deposit loan in whole or in
part more than 10 weeks from the day on which the deferred deposit loan is
first executed;
(d)  extend a new deferred deposit loan to a person on the same business day
that the person makes a payment on another deferred deposit loan if the
payment:
(i)  is made at least 10 weeks after the day on which that deferred deposit
loan is extended; and
(ii)  results in the principal of that deferred deposit loan being paid in
full;
(e)  threaten to use or use the criminal process in any state to collect on
the deferred deposit loan; or
(f)  in connection with the collection of money owed on a deferred deposit
loan, communicate with a person who owes money on a deferred deposit loan at
the person's place of employment if the person or the person's employer
communicates, orally or in writing, to the deferred deposit lender that the
person's employer prohibits the person from receiving these communications.
(5)  Notwithstanding Subsections (4)(a) and (e), a deferred deposit lender
that is the holder of a check used to obtain a deferred deposit loan that is
dishonored may use the remedies and notice procedures provided in Chapter 15,
Dishonored Instruments, except that the issuer, as defined in Section 7-15-1,
of the check may not be:
(a)  asked by the holder to pay the amount described in Subsection
7-15-1(6)(a)(iii) as a condition of the holder not filing a civil action; or
(b)  held liable for the damages described in Subsection 7-15-1(7)(b)(vi).
